Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 2. Filing and Recording of Documents Related to a Manufactured Home

38-29-201.
Verification of application form - supporting materials.

In all instances under part 1 of this article in which an application for a certificate of title is filed with an authorized agent pursuant to section 38-29-107, the authorized agent, in his or her capacity as the clerk and recorder, shall file and record the documents set forth in subsection (2) of this section in his or her office.

For an application for a certificate of title for a new manufactured home, the following documents shall be filed and recorded:

The manufacturer’s certificate or statement of origin or its equivalent; and

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-040), ch. 9, p. 67, § 8, effective July 1, 2009.)

The verification of application form.

For an application for a certificate of title for which a bond is furnished pursuant to section 38-29-119 (2), the following documents shall be filed and recorded:

A copy of the written declaration required pursuant to section 38-29-119 (1);

A copy of the bond that was furnished; and

The verification of application form.

For all other applications for a certificate of title, the following documents shall be filed and recorded:

A copy of the certificate of title presented to the authorized agent, if any; and

The verification of application form.

A verification of application form shall comply with the federal “Driver’s Privacy Protection Act of 1994”, 18 U.S.C. sec. 2721 et seq.

History.

Source:
L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 445, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(2)(a) amended and (3) added, (SB 09-040), ch. 9, p. 67, § 8, effective July 1.

38-29-202.
Certificate of permanent location.

If a manufactured home is permanently affixed to the ground so that it is no longer capable of being drawn over the public highways on or after July 1, 2008, the owner of the manufactured home shall file a certificate of permanent location.

If the certificate of permanent location accompanies an application for purging a manufactured home title pursuant to section 38-29-112 (1.5) or 38-29-118 (2), the certificate shall be filed with the authorized agent for the county or city and county in which the manufactured home is located. For a manufactured home that occupies real property subject to a long-term lease that has an express term of at least ten years, a copy of the lease shall be filed along with the certificate. The authorized agent, in his or her capacity as the clerk and recorder, shall file and record the certificate of permanent location and, if applicable, the copy of the long-term lease in his or her office.

If the certificate of permanent location is received in accordance with section 38-29-114 (2) or 38-29-117 (6), the certificate shall be filed with the clerk and recorder for the county or city and county in which the manufactured home is located. For a manufactured home that occupies real property subject to a long-term lease that has an express term of at least ten years, a copy of the lease shall be filed along with the certificate. The clerk and recorder shall file and record the certificate of permanent location, a copy of the bill of sale, a copy of the manufacturer’s certificate or statement of origin or its equivalent, and, if applicable, the copy of the long-term lease in his or her office and destroy the original manufacturer’s certificate or statement of origin or its equivalent.

At least one of the owners of the manufactured home, as reflected on the certificate of title, the bill of sale, or the manufacturer’s certificate or statement of origin or its equivalent, must be an owner of record of the real property to which the manufactured home is to be affixed or permanently located; except that this paragraph (d) shall not apply to any manufactured home that occupies real property subject to a long-term lease that has an express term of at least ten years.

The property tax administrator shall establish the form of the certificate of permanent location. In addition to any other information that the administrator may require, the certificate shall include the following:

The name and mailing address of the owner of the manufactured home;

The name and mailing address of any holder of a mortgage on the manufactured home or on the real property to which the home has been affixed;

The identification number of the manufactured home and the certificate of title number, if applicable;

The manufacturer or make and year of the manufactured home;

Attached to the certificate of permanent location, a certificate of taxes due, or an authentication of paid ad valorem taxes, issued by the county treasurer of the county in which the manufactured home is located;

The legal description of the real property to which the manufactured home has been permanently affixed;

The name of the legal owner or owners of the land upon which the home is affixed;

The county or city and county in which the certificate of permanent location is filed;

Verification that the manufactured home is permanently affixed to the ground so that it is no longer capable of being drawn over the public highways in accordance with any applicable county or city and county codes or requirements;

Consent to the permanent location of the manufactured home by all holders of a security interest in the manufactured home;

An affirmative statement of relinquishment and release of all rights in the manufactured home by all holders of a security interest in the manufactured home;

An affirmative statement of relinquishment of all rights in the manufactured home by any owner on the certificate of title of the manufactured home who is not also an owner of the real property to which the manufactured home is to be affixed or permanently located. The provisions of this paragraph (l) shall not apply to any manufactured home that occupies real property subject to a long-term lease that has an express term of at least ten years.

For any manufactured home that occupies real property subject to a long-term lease that has an express term of at least ten years, an affirmative statement that all owners of the real property and the manufactured home consent to the affixation of the manufactured home to the real property and an acknowledgment that, upon such affixation and upon the filing and recording of the certificate of permanent location, the manufactured home will become a part of the real property, subject to the reversion of the manufactured home to the owners of the home upon termination of the long-term lease; and

An affirmative statement that all owners of the real property and the manufactured home consent to the affixation of the manufactured home to the real property and an acknowledgment that upon such affixation and upon the filing and recording of the certificate of permanent location the manufactured home will become a part of the real property and ownership shall be vested only in the title owners of the real property. Ownership in the manufactured home shall vest in the same parties and be subject to the same tenancies, encumbrances, liens, limitations, restrictions, and estates as the real property to which the manufactured home is affixed or permanently located. The provisions of this paragraph (m) shall not apply to any manufactured home that occupies real property subject to a long-term lease that has an express term of at least ten years.

The certificate of permanent location shall be acknowledged and shall contain or be accompanied by a written declaration that the statements made therein are made under the penalties of perjury in the second degree, as defined in section 18-8-503, C.R.S.

History.

Source:
L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 446, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(b), (1)(c), (2)(i), and (2)(l) amended and (2)(l.5) added, (SB 09- 040), ch. 9, p. 67, § 9, effective July 1.

38-29-203.
Certificate of removal.

On or after July 1, 2008, a manufactured home shall not be removed from its permanent location unless the owner of the manufactured home files a certificate of removal. If a certificate of permanent location has not been previously filed and recorded for the manufactured home, the owner shall also file an affidavit of real property, described in section 38-29-208, along with the certificate of removal.

The certificate of removal and the affidavit of real property, if any, along with the application for a new certificate of title required in part 1 of this article, shall be filed with the authorized agent for the county or city and county in which the manufactured home is located. The authorized agent, in his or her capacity as the clerk and recorder, shall file and record the certificate of removal and the affidavit of real property in his or her office.

The property tax administrator shall establish the form of the certificate of removal. In addition to any other information that the administrator may require, the certificate shall include the following:

The name and mailing address of the owner of the manufactured home;

The name and mailing address of any holder of a mortgage on or lien against the real property on which the manufactured home was affixed or permanently located;

The identification number of the manufactured home;

The manufacturer or make and year of the manufactured home;

Attached to the certificate of removal, a certificate of taxes due, or an authentication of paid ad valorem taxes, issued by the county treasurer of the county in which the manufactured home is located;

The legal description of the real property from which the manufactured home was removed; and

Consent of all lienholders and a release by all holders of a mortgage, only to the extent that the mortgage or lien applies to the manufactured home, to allow the removal of the manufactured home from its permanent location.

(2.5)

The provisions of this section shall apply to a manufactured home that occupies real property subject to a long-term lease that has an express term of at least ten years, except as set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2.5).

A landlord evicting a tenant who owns a manufactured home that occupies real property subject to a long-term lease that has an express term of at least ten years may cause the home to be removed from its permanent location without the owner first filing a certificate of removal if, within twenty days after such removal, the landlord files a certificate of removal accompanied by a copy of the notice of judgment or order for possession allowing the eviction of the home and the address of the location to which the home has been moved. Such certificate of removal shall comply with subsection (5) of this section and include the information required in subsection (2) of this section; except that paragraphs (e) and (g) of said subsection (2) shall not apply. The landlord shall file the certificate of removal and the additional information with the authorized agent for the county or city and county from which the manufactured home was removed.

The consent of a mortgage or other lienholder on the certificate of removal shall serve as a full release of any interest against the manufactured home once the manufactured home is removed from the real property. The consent on the certificate of removal shall not release any interest of the mortgage or lienholder against the remaining real property.

If consent of any mortgagee or lienholder is not given, the owner may file a corporate surety bond or any other undertaking with the clerk of the district court of the county in which the real property to which the manufactured home was affixed is situated. The bond or undertaking shall be in an amount equal to one and one-half times the amount of the mortgage or lien and shall be approved by a judge of the district court with which the bond or undertaking is filed. The bond or undertaking shall be conditioned that, if the mortgagee or lienholder shall be finally adjudged to be entitled to recover upon the mortgage or lien, the principal or his sureties shall pay to the mortgagee or lienholder the amount of the indebtedness together with any interest, costs, and other sums which the mortgagee or lienholder would be entitled to recover upon foreclosure of the mortgage or lien. Upon the filing of a bond or undertaking, the mortgage or lien against the property shall be forthwith discharged and released in full, and the real property described in the bond or undertaking shall be released from the mortgage or lien and from any action brought to foreclose the mortgage or lien, and the bond or undertaking shall be substituted. The clerk of the district court with which the bond or undertaking has been filed shall issue a certificate of release that shall be recorded in the office of the clerk and recorder of the county in which the real property to which the manufactured home was affixed is situated, and the certificate of release shall show that the property has been released from the mortgage or lien and from any action brought to foreclose the mortgage or lien.

The certificate of removal shall be acknowledged and shall contain or be accompanied by a written declaration that the statements made therein are made under the penalties of perjury in the second degree, as defined in section 18-8-503, C.R.S.

History.

Source:
L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 448, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(2.5) added, (SB 09-040), ch. 9, p. 69, § 10, effective July 1.

38-29-204.
Certificate of destruction.

If a manufactured home is destroyed, dismantled, or sold or otherwise disposed of as salvage on or after July 1, 2008, the owner of the manufactured home or the person on whose real property the manufactured home is situated shall file a certificate of destruction.

If the certificate of destruction accompanies an application to cancel a certificate of title pursuant to section 38-29-118 (1), the certificate shall be filed with the authorized agent for the county or city and county in which the manufactured home is or was located. The authorized agent, in his or her capacity as the clerk and recorder, shall file and record the certificate of destruction in his or her office.

If an application to cancel a certificate of title is not required pursuant to section 38-29-118 (1) because no certificate of title was ever issued or because the title has been purged, the certificate of destruction shall be filed with the county clerk and recorder for the county or city and county in which the manufactured home is or was located. The clerk and recorder shall file and record the certificate of destruction in his or her office.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a manufactured home has been deemed materially dangerous or materially hazardous, pursuant to local building or health codes by a governmental entity, the person on whose real property the manufactured home is situated may file and record a certificate of destruction without attaching a certificate of taxes due or an authentication of paid ad valorem taxes and without surrendering a certificate of title or filing an application to cancel a certificate of title. Any certificate of destruction filed and recorded pursuant to this paragraph (d) shall be accompanied by the evidence of violation.

The certificate of destruction and the evidence of violation shall be filed and recorded with the clerk and recorder for the county or city and county in which the manufactured home is or was located. The clerk and recorder shall file and record the certificate of destruction and the evidence of violation in his or her office.

For purposes of this paragraph (d):

“Evidence of violation” means a notice and order from a governmental entity that a manufactured home has been deemed materially dangerous or materially hazardous pursuant to local building or health codes and that all applicable cure periods have expired.

“Governmental entity” means any federal agency, the state, or any county, town, city, or city and county.

The property tax administrator shall establish the form of the certificate of destruction. In addition to any other information that the administrator may require, the certificate shall include the following:

The name and mailing address of the owner of the manufactured home;

The name and mailing address of each holder of a security interest in the manufactured home and all holders of a lien against the real property on which the manufactured home was affixed or permanently located;

The identification number of the manufactured home;

The manufacturer or make and year of the manufactured home;

Attached to the certificate of destruction, a certificate of taxes due, or an authentication of paid ad valorem taxes, issued by the county treasurer of the county in which the manufactured home is located;

The legal description of the real property on which the manufactured home was affixed or permanently located prior to destruction;

A book and page or reception number reference for a certificate of permanent location that was previously filed related to the manufactured home, if any;

Consent of all lienholders to the destruction of the manufactured home, or proof that a request for such consent was sent by certified mail to such lienholders, along with proof that a copy of the request for such consent was mailed to the owner if the certificate of destruction is filed by the person on whose real property the manufactured home is situated, at their last-known address and a notarized declaration, signed under penalty of perjury, that no response was received from any such lienholders within thirty days of the date of the mailing of the notice;

Release of all holders of a mortgage to the extent that the mortgage applies to the manufactured home, or proof that a request for such consent was sent by certified mail to such mortgage holders at their last-known address and a notarized declaration, signed under penalty of perjury, that no response was received within thirty days of the date of the mailing of the notice; and

Verification that the manufactured home has been destroyed, dismantled, or sold or otherwise disposed of as salvage.

The certificate of destruction shall be acknowledged and shall contain or be accompanied by a written declaration that the statements made therein are made under the penalties of perjury in the second degree, as defined in section 18-8-503, C.R.S.

Any owner or person on whose real property the manufactured home is situated who fails to file a properly completed certificate of destruction when required pursuant to this section shall be responsible for all actual damages sustained by any affected party related to the manufactured home being destroyed, dismantled, or sold or otherwise disposed of as salvage.

History.

Source:
L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 450, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(1)(a), (2)(h), and (4) amended and (1)(d) added, (HB 11-1174), ch. 91, p. 269, § 1, effective August 10.

38-29-205.
Authorized agent - forward to the clerk and recorder.

If an authorized agent who receives a document for filing and recording pursuant to this part 2 is not the clerk and recorder for the county or city and county, the authorized agent shall forward such document to the clerk and recorder, for the clerk and recorder to file and record the document in his or her office.

History.

Source:
L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 451, § 9, effective July 1.

38-29-206.
Recorded documents - index.

Any document filed and recorded by a clerk and recorder pursuant to this part 2 shall be indexed in both the grantor and grantee indexes under the name of the owner or owners of the manufactured home and the owners of the land to which the manufactured home was affixed or permanently located at the time the document is required to be filed and recorded.

History.

Source:
L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 451, § 9, effective July 1.

38-29-207.
Copy of certificates to assessor.

The clerk and recorder shall forward a copy of a certificate of permanent location, certificate of removal, and certificate of destruction to the assessor for the county or city and county.

History.

Source:
L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 451, § 9, effective July 1.

38-29-208.
Affidavit of real property.

Any person can prove that a manufactured home and the land upon which it has been permanently affixed is real property by filing an affidavit of real property with the clerk and recorder for the county or city and county in which the manufactured home is located. The clerk and recorder shall file and record the affidavit of real property in his or her office. Except as otherwise set forth in subsection (2) of this section, the affidavit of real property shall include the following:

An acknowledged statement by all owners that the manufactured home and real property to which the manufactured home is permanently affixed became real property pursuant to this article;

A statement from the county assessor that the manufactured home has been valued together with the land upon which it is affixed;

A statement from the county treasurer that taxes have been paid on the manufactured home and the land upon which it is affixed in the same manner as other real property, as that term is defined in section 39-1-102 (14), C.R.S.;

Proof that a search of the director’s records pursuant to section 42-1-206, C.R.S., was conducted and that no certificate of title was found for the manufactured home; and

Verification that the manufactured home is permanently affixed to the ground in accordance with any applicable county or city and county codes or requirements so that it is no longer capable of being drawn over the public highways.

If a manufactured home occupies real property subject to a long-term lease that has an express term of at least ten years, then the affidavit of real property shall include the following:

A copy of the applicable long-term lease;

A statement from the county treasurer that taxes have been paid separately on the manufactured home and the land upon which it is affixed; and

The items set forth in paragraphs (a), (d), and (e) of subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Source:
L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 451, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

IP(1) and (1)(e) amended and (2) added, (SB 09-040), ch. 9, p. 69, § 11, effective July 1.

38-29-209.
Fees - disposition.

In all instances in which a document is to be filed and recorded pursuant to this part 2, the authorized agent or clerk and recorder, as the case may be, shall be paid such fees for each document so filed and recorded as are prescribed by law for the filing of like instruments in the office of the county clerk and recorder.

The recording fees authorized by this section are in addition to any fees that are required pursuant to section 38-29-138.

All fees paid pursuant to this section shall be kept and retained by the authorized agent or the clerk and recorder to defray the cost thereof and shall be disposed of by him or her as provided by law.

History.

Source:
L. 2008:

Entire part added, p. 452, § 9, effective July 1.